Washington statutes.
RCW 35.101.057

Lodging charge—Additional charge. (Expires July 1, 2027.)

(1) In addition to the two dollar charge authorized by RCW 35.101.050, a legislative authority may impose an additional charge of up to three dollars per night of stay on the furnishing of lodging by a lodging business located in the area. To impose the additional charge, signatures of the persons who operate lodging businesses who would pay sixty percent or more of the proposed charges must be provided together with the proposed uses and projects to which the proposed revenue from the additional charge shall be put, the total estimate costs, and the estimated rate for the charge with a proposed breakdown by class of lodging business if such classification is to be used.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2027.

[ 2020 c 215 s 2.]